New Jersey, session 222, A4240.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Department" means the Department of Health. "Mold" means any form of multicellular fungi that lives on plant or animal matter and in indoor environments.  Types of mold include, but are not limited to, Cladosporium, Penicillium, Alternaria, Aspergillus, Fusarium, Trichoderma, Memnoniella, Mucor and Stachybotrys Chartarum, often found in water-damaged building materials. 2.    a.  Within six months after the effective date of this act, the Department of Health shall establish procedures for the department to inspect any reports made to the department of mold infestation with buildings or homes that are subject to the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to Title 26 of the Revised Statutes. b.    Within six months after the effective date of this act, the Department of Health shall establish guidelines for preventing or removing mold from buildings or homes that are subject to the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to Title 26 of the Revised Statutes. 3.    The Department of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.